Illinois, session 104th, SB3412.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 1-160 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/1-160)7    (Text of Section from P.A. 102-719)8    Sec. 1-160. Provisions applicable to new hires. 9    (a) The provisions of this Section apply to a person who, 10on or after January 1, 2011, first becomes a member or a 11participant under any reciprocal retirement system or pension 12fund established under this Code, other than a retirement 13system or pension fund established under Article 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 147, 15, or 18 of this Code, notwithstanding any other provision 15of this Code to the contrary, but do not apply to any 16self-managed plan established under this Code or to any 17participant of the retirement plan established under Section 1822-101; except that this Section applies to a person who 19elected to establish alternative credits by electing in 20writing after January 1, 2011, but before August 8, 2011, 21under Section 7-145.1 of this Code. Notwithstanding anything 22to the contrary in this Section, for purposes of this Section, 23a person who is a Tier 1 regular employee as defined in Section   SB3412- 2 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b17-109.4 of this Code or who participated in a retirement 2system under Article 15 prior to January 1, 2011 shall be 3deemed a person who first became a member or participant prior 4to January 1, 2011 under any retirement system or pension fund 5subject to this Section. The changes made to this Section by 6Public Act 98-596 are a clarification of existing law and are 7intended to be retroactive to January 1, 2011 (the effective 8date of Public Act 96-889), notwithstanding the provisions of 9Section 1-103.1 of this Code.10    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 11noncovered employee under Article 14 on or after the 12implementation date of the plan created under Section 1-161 13for that Article, unless that person elects under subsection 14(b) of Section 1-161 to instead receive the benefits provided 15under this Section and the applicable provisions of that 16Article.17    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 18member or participant under Article 16 on or after the 19implementation date of the plan created under Section 1-161 20for that Article, unless that person elects under subsection 21(b) of Section 1-161 to instead receive the benefits provided 22under this Section and the applicable provisions of that 23Article.24    This Section does not apply to a person who elects under 25subsection (c-5) of Section 1-161 to receive the benefits 26under Section 1-161.   SB3412- 3 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 2member or participant of an affected pension fund on or after 6 3months after the resolution or ordinance date, as defined in 4Section 1-162, unless that person elects under subsection (c) 5of Section 1-162 to receive the benefits provided under this 6Section and the applicable provisions of the Article under 7which he or she is a member or participant. 8    (b) "Final average salary" means, except as otherwise 9provided in this subsection, the average monthly (or annual) 10salary obtained by dividing the total salary or earnings 11calculated under the Article applicable to the member or 12participant during the 96 consecutive months (or 8 consecutive 13years) of service within the last 120 months (or 10 years) of 14service in which the total salary or earnings calculated under 15the applicable Article was the highest by the number of months 16(or years) of service in that period. For the purposes of a 17person who first becomes a member or participant of any 18retirement system or pension fund to which this Section 19applies on or after January 1, 2011, in this Code, "final 20average salary" shall be substituted for the following:21        (1) (Blank).22        (2) In Articles 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12, "highest average 23    annual salary for any 4 consecutive years within the last 24    10 years of service immediately preceding the date of 25    withdrawal". 26        (3) In Article 13, "average final salary".   SB3412- 4 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1        (4) In Article 14, "final average compensation". 2        (5) In Article 17, "average salary". 3        (6) In Section 22-207, "wages or salary received by 4    him at the date of retirement or discharge". 5    A member of the Teachers' Retirement System of the State 6of Illinois who retires on or after June 1, 2021 and for whom 7the 2020-2021 school year is used in the calculation of the 8member's final average salary shall use the higher of the 9following for the purpose of determining the member's final 10average salary:11        (A) the amount otherwise calculated under the first 12    paragraph of this subsection; or13        (B) an amount calculated by the Teachers' Retirement 14    System of the State of Illinois using the average of the 15    monthly (or annual) salary obtained by dividing the total 16    salary or earnings calculated under Article 16 applicable 17    to the member or participant during the 96 months (or 8 18    years) of service within the last 120 months (or 10 years) 19    of service in which the total salary or earnings 20    calculated under the Article was the highest by the number 21    of months (or years) of service in that period.22    (b-5) Beginning on January 1, 2011, for all purposes under 23this Code (including without limitation the calculation of 24benefits and employee contributions), the annual earnings, 25salary, or wages (based on the plan year) of a member or 26participant to whom this Section applies shall not exceed   SB3412- 5 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1$106,800; however, that amount shall annually thereafter be 2increased by the lesser of (i) 3% of that amount, including all 3previous adjustments, or (ii) one-half the annual unadjusted 4percentage increase (but not less than zero) in the consumer 5price index-u for the 12 months ending with the September 6preceding each November 1, including all previous adjustments.7    For the purposes of this Section, "consumer price index-u" 8means the index published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of 9the United States Department of Labor that measures the 10average change in prices of goods and services purchased by 11all urban consumers, United States city average, all items, 121982-84 = 100. The new amount resulting from each annual 13adjustment shall be determined by the Public Pension Division 14of the Department of Insurance and made available to the 15boards of the retirement systems and pension funds by November 161 of each year. 17    (b-10) Beginning on January 1, 2024, for all purposes 18under this Code (including, without limitation, the 19calculation of benefits and employee contributions), the 20annual earnings, salary, or wages (based on the plan year) of a 21member or participant under Article 9 to whom this Section 22applies shall include an annual earnings, salary, or wage cap 23that tracks the Social Security wage base. Maximum annual 24earnings, wages, or salary shall be the annual contribution 25and benefit base established for the applicable year by the 26Commissioner of the Social Security Administration under the   SB3412- 6 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1federal Social Security Act. 2    However, in no event shall the annual earnings, salary, or 3wages for the purposes of this Article and Article 9 exceed any 4limitation imposed on annual earnings, salary, or wages under 5Section 1-117. Under no circumstances shall the maximum amount 6of annual earnings, salary, or wages be greater than the 7amount set forth in this subsection (b-10) as a result of 8reciprocal service or any provisions regarding reciprocal 9services, nor shall the Fund under Article 9 be required to pay 10any refund as a result of the application of this maximum 11annual earnings, salary, and wage cap. 12    Nothing in this subsection (b-10) shall cause or otherwise 13result in any retroactive adjustment of any employee 14contributions. Nothing in this subsection (b-10) shall cause 15or otherwise result in any retroactive adjustment of 16disability or other payments made between January 1, 2011 and 17January 1, 2024. 18    (c) A member or participant is entitled to a retirement 19annuity upon written application if he or she has attained age 2067 (age 65, with respect to service under Article 12 that is 21subject to this Section, for a member or participant under 22Article 12 who first becomes a member or participant under 23Article 12 on or after January 1, 2022 or who makes the 24election under item (i) of subsection (d-15) of this Section) 25and has at least 10 years of service credit and is otherwise 26eligible under the requirements of the applicable Article.   SB3412- 7 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1    A member or participant who has attained age 62 (age 60, 2with respect to service under Article 12 that is subject to 3this Section, for a member or participant under Article 12 who 4first becomes a member or participant under Article 12 on or 5after January 1, 2022 or who makes the election under item (i) 6of subsection (d-15) of this Section) and has at least 10 years 7of service credit and is otherwise eligible under the 8requirements of the applicable Article may elect to receive 9the lower retirement annuity provided in subsection (d) of 10this Section. 11    (c-5) A person who first becomes a member or a participant 12subject to this Section on or after July 6, 2017 (the effective 13date of Public Act 100-23), notwithstanding any other 14provision of this Code to the contrary, is entitled to a 15retirement annuity under Article 8 or Article 11 upon written 16application if he or she has attained age 65 and has at least 1710 years of service credit and is otherwise eligible under the 18requirements of Article 8 or Article 11 of this Code, 19whichever is applicable. 20    (c-10) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code to 21the contrary, a participant who is subject to this Section and 22is (i) a deputy sheriff under Article 9, (ii) a member of the 23Cook County Police Department under Article 9, (iii) a 24correctional officer under Article 9, or (iv) a police officer 25with the Cook County Forest Preserve District under Article 10 26is entitled to a retirement annuity upon written application   SB3412- 8 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1if he or she has attained age 55, has at least 20 years of 2service credit for service in any combination of those 3positions, and is otherwise eligible under the applicable 4Article of this Code. 5    (d) The retirement annuity of a member or participant who 6is retiring after attaining age 62 (age 60, with respect to 7service under Article 12 that is subject to this Section, for a 8member or participant under Article 12 who first becomes a 9member or participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 102022 or who makes the election under item (i) of subsection 11(d-15) of this Section) with at least 10 years of service 12credit shall be reduced by one-half of 1% for each full month 13that the member's age is under age 67 (age 65, with respect to 14service under Article 12 that is subject to this Section, for a 15member or participant under Article 12 who first becomes a 16member or participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 172022 or who makes the election under item (i) of subsection 18(d-15) of this Section).19    (d-5) The retirement annuity payable under Article 8 or 20Article 11 to an eligible person subject to subsection (c-5) 21of this Section who is retiring at age 60 with at least 10 22years of service credit shall be reduced by one-half of 1% for 23each full month that the member's age is under age 65. 24    (d-10) Each person who first became a member or 25participant under Article 8 or Article 11 of this Code on or 26after January 1, 2011 and prior to July 6, 2017 (the effective   SB3412- 9 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1date of Public Act 100-23) shall make an irrevocable election 2either:3        (i) to be eligible for the reduced retirement age 4    provided in subsections (c-5) and (d-5) of this Section, 5    the eligibility for which is conditioned upon the member 6    or participant agreeing to the increases in employee 7    contributions for age and service annuities provided in 8    subsection (a-5) of Section 8-174 of this Code (for 9    service under Article 8) or subsection (a-5) of Section 10    11-170 of this Code (for service under Article 11); or 11        (ii) to not agree to item (i) of this subsection 12    (d-10), in which case the member or participant shall 13    continue to be subject to the retirement age provisions in 14    subsections (c) and (d) of this Section and the employee 15    contributions for age and service annuity as provided in 16    subsection (a) of Section 8-174 of this Code (for service 17    under Article 8) or subsection (a) of Section 11-170 of 18    this Code (for service under Article 11). 19    The election provided for in this subsection shall be made 20between October 1, 2017 and November 15, 2017. A person 21subject to this subsection who makes the required election 22shall remain bound by that election. A person subject to this 23subsection who fails for any reason to make the required 24election within the time specified in this subsection shall be 25deemed to have made the election under item (ii). 26    (d-15) Each person who first becomes a member or   SB3412- 10 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 2011 and 2prior to January 1, 2022 shall make an irrevocable election 3either: 4        (i) to be eligible for the reduced retirement age 5    specified in subsections (c) and (d) of this Section, the 6    eligibility for which is conditioned upon the member or 7    participant agreeing to the increase in employee 8    contributions for service annuities specified in 9    subsection (b) of Section 12-150; or10        (ii) to not agree to item (i) of this subsection 11    (d-15), in which case the member or participant shall not 12    be eligible for the reduced retirement age specified in 13    subsections (c) and (d) of this Section and shall not be 14    subject to the increase in employee contributions for 15    service annuities specified in subsection (b) of Section 16    12-150. 17    The election provided for in this subsection shall be made 18between January 1, 2022 and April 1, 2022. A person subject to 19this subsection who makes the required election shall remain 20bound by that election. A person subject to this subsection 21who fails for any reason to make the required election within 22the time specified in this subsection shall be deemed to have 23made the election under item (ii). 24    (e) Any retirement annuity or supplemental annuity shall 25be subject to annual increases on the January 1 occurring 26either on or after the attainment of age 67 (age 65, with   SB3412- 11 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1respect to service under Article 12 that is subject to this 2Section, for a member or participant under Article 12 who 3first becomes a member or participant under Article 12 on or 4after January 1, 2022 or who makes the election under item (i) 5of subsection (d-15); and beginning on July 6, 2017 (the 6effective date of Public Act 100-23), age 65 with respect to 7service under Article 8 or Article 11 for eligible persons 8who: (i) are subject to subsection (c-5) of this Section; or 9(ii) made the election under item (i) of subsection (d-10) of 10this Section) or the first anniversary of the annuity start 11date, whichever is later. Each annual increase shall be 12calculated at 3% or one-half the annual unadjusted percentage 13increase (but not less than zero) in the consumer price 14index-u for the 12 months ending with the September preceding 15each November 1, whichever is less, of the originally granted 16retirement annuity. If the annual unadjusted percentage change 17in the consumer price index-u for the 12 months ending with the 18September preceding each November 1 is zero or there is a 19decrease, then the annuity shall not be increased. 20    For the purposes of Section 1-103.1 of this Code, the 21changes made to this Section by Public Act 102-263 are 22applicable without regard to whether the employee was in 23active service on or after August 6, 2021 (the effective date 24of Public Act 102-263). 25    For the purposes of Section 1-103.1 of this Code, the 26changes made to this Section by Public Act 100-23 are   SB3412- 12 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1applicable without regard to whether the employee was in 2active service on or after July 6, 2017 (the effective date of 3Public Act 100-23). 4    (f) The initial survivor's or widow's annuity of an 5otherwise eligible survivor or widow of a retired member or 6participant who first became a member or participant on or 7after January 1, 2011 shall be in the amount of 66 2/3% of the 8retired member's or participant's retirement annuity at the 9date of death. In the case of the death of a member or 10participant who has not retired and who first became a member 11or participant on or after January 1, 2011, eligibility for a 12survivor's or widow's annuity shall be determined by the 13applicable Article of this Code. The initial benefit shall be 1466 2/3% of the earned annuity without a reduction due to age. A 15child's annuity of an otherwise eligible child shall be in the 16amount prescribed under each Article if applicable. Any 17survivor's or widow's annuity shall be increased (1) on each 18January 1 occurring on or after the commencement of the 19annuity if the deceased member died while receiving a 20retirement annuity or (2) in other cases, on each January 1 21occurring after the first anniversary of the commencement of 22the annuity. Each annual increase shall be calculated at 3% or 23one-half the annual unadjusted percentage increase (but not 24less than zero) in the consumer price index-u for the 12 months 25ending with the September preceding each November 1, whichever 26is less, of the originally granted survivor's annuity. If the   SB3412- 13 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1annual unadjusted percentage change in the consumer price 2index-u for the 12 months ending with the September preceding 3each November 1 is zero or there is a decrease, then the 4annuity shall not be increased. 5    (g) The benefits in Section 14-110 apply if the person is a 6fire fighter in the fire protection service of a department, a 7security employee of the Department of Corrections or the 8Department of Juvenile Justice, or a security employee of the 9Department of Innovation and Technology, as those terms are 10defined in subsection (b) and subsection (c) of Section 1114-110. A person who meets the requirements of this Section is 12entitled to an annuity calculated under the provisions of 13Section 14-110, in lieu of the regular or minimum retirement 14annuity, only if the person has withdrawn from service with 15not less than 20 years of eligible creditable service and has 16attained age 60, regardless of whether the attainment of age 1760 occurs while the person is still in service. 18    (g-5) The benefits in Section 14-110 apply if the person 19is a State policeman, investigator for the Secretary of State, 20conservation police officer, investigator for the Department 21of Revenue or the Illinois Gaming Board, investigator for the 22Office of the Attorney General, Commerce Commission police 23officer, or arson investigator, as those terms are defined in 24subsection (b) and subsection (c) of Section 14-110. A person 25who meets the requirements of this Section is entitled to an 26annuity calculated under the provisions of Section 14-110, in   SB3412- 14 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1lieu of the regular or minimum retirement annuity, only if the 2person has withdrawn from service with not less than 20 years 3of eligible creditable service and has attained age 55, 4regardless of whether the attainment of age 55 occurs while 5the person is still in service. 6    (h) If a person who first becomes a member or a participant 7of a retirement system or pension fund subject to this Section 8on or after January 1, 2011 is receiving a retirement annuity 9or retirement pension under that system or fund and becomes a 10member or participant under any other system or fund created 11by this Code and is employed on a full-time basis, except for 12those members or participants exempted from the provisions of 13this Section under subsection (a) of this Section, then the 14person's retirement annuity or retirement pension under that 15system or fund shall be suspended during that employment. Upon 16termination of that employment, the person's retirement 17annuity or retirement pension payments shall resume and be 18recalculated if recalculation is provided for under the 19applicable Article of this Code.20    If a person who first becomes a member of a retirement 21system or pension fund subject to this Section on or after 22January 1, 2012 and is receiving a retirement annuity or 23retirement pension under that system or fund and accepts on a 24contractual basis a position to provide services to a 25governmental entity from which he or she has retired, then 26that person's annuity or retirement pension earned as an   SB3412- 15 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1active employee of the employer shall be suspended during that 2contractual service. A person receiving an annuity or 3retirement pension under this Code shall notify the pension 4fund or retirement system from which he or she is receiving an 5annuity or retirement pension, as well as his or her 6contractual employer, of his or her retirement status before 7accepting contractual employment. A person who fails to submit 8such notification shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and 9required to pay a fine of $1,000. Upon termination of that 10contractual employment, the person's retirement annuity or 11retirement pension payments shall resume and, if appropriate, 12be recalculated under the applicable provisions of this Code. 13    (i) (Blank). 14    (j) In the case of a conflict between the provisions of 15this Section and any other provision of this Code, the 16provisions of this Section shall control.17(Source: P.A. 101-610, eff. 1-1-20; 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 18102-210, eff. 1-1-22; 102-263, eff. 8-6-21; 102-719, eff. 195-6-22; 103-529, eff. 8-11-23.) 20    (Text of Section from P.A. 102-813)21    Sec. 1-160. Provisions applicable to new hires. 22    (a) The provisions of this Section apply to a person who, 23on or after January 1, 2011, first becomes a member or a 24participant under any reciprocal retirement system or pension 25fund established under this Code, other than a retirement   SB3412- 16 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1system or pension fund established under Article 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 27, 15, or 18 of this Code, notwithstanding any other provision 3of this Code to the contrary, but do not apply to any 4self-managed plan established under this Code or to any 5participant of the retirement plan established under Section 622-101; except that this Section applies to a person who 7elected to establish alternative credits by electing in 8writing after January 1, 2011, but before August 8, 2011, 9under Section 7-145.1 of this Code. Notwithstanding anything 10to the contrary in this Section, for purposes of this Section, 11a person who is a Tier 1 regular employee as defined in Section 127-109.4 of this Code or who participated in a retirement 13system under Article 15 prior to January 1, 2011 shall be 14deemed a person who first became a member or participant prior 15to January 1, 2011 under any retirement system or pension fund 16subject to this Section. The changes made to this Section by 17Public Act 98-596 are a clarification of existing law and are 18intended to be retroactive to January 1, 2011 (the effective 19date of Public Act 96-889), notwithstanding the provisions of 20Section 1-103.1 of this Code.21    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 22noncovered employee under Article 14 on or after the 23implementation date of the plan created under Section 1-161 24for that Article, unless that person elects under subsection 25(b) of Section 1-161 to instead receive the benefits provided 26under this Section and the applicable provisions of that   SB3412- 17 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1Article.2    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 3member or participant under Article 16 on or after the 4implementation date of the plan created under Section 1-161 5for that Article, unless that person elects under subsection 6(b) of Section 1-161 to instead receive the benefits provided 7under this Section and the applicable provisions of that 8Article.9    This Section does not apply to a person who elects under 10subsection (c-5) of Section 1-161 to receive the benefits 11under Section 1-161. 12    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 13member or participant of an affected pension fund on or after 6 14months after the resolution or ordinance date, as defined in 15Section 1-162, unless that person elects under subsection (c) 16of Section 1-162 to receive the benefits provided under this 17Section and the applicable provisions of the Article under 18which he or she is a member or participant. 19    (b) "Final average salary" means, except as otherwise 20provided in this subsection, the average monthly (or annual) 21salary obtained by dividing the total salary or earnings 22calculated under the Article applicable to the member or 23participant during the 96 consecutive months (or 8 consecutive 24years) of service within the last 120 months (or 10 years) of 25service in which the total salary or earnings calculated under 26the applicable Article was the highest by the number of months   SB3412- 18 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1(or years) of service in that period. For the purposes of a 2person who first becomes a member or participant of any 3retirement system or pension fund to which this Section 4applies on or after January 1, 2011, in this Code, "final 5average salary" shall be substituted for the following:6        (1) (Blank).7        (2) In Articles 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12, "highest average 8    annual salary for any 4 consecutive years within the last 9    10 years of service immediately preceding the date of 10    withdrawal". 11        (3) In Article 13, "average final salary". 12        (4) In Article 14, "final average compensation". 13        (5) In Article 17, "average salary". 14        (6) In Section 22-207, "wages or salary received by 15    him at the date of retirement or discharge". 16    A member of the Teachers' Retirement System of the State 17of Illinois who retires on or after June 1, 2021 and for whom 18the 2020-2021 school year is used in the calculation of the 19member's final average salary shall use the higher of the 20following for the purpose of determining the member's final 21average salary:22        (A) the amount otherwise calculated under the first 23    paragraph of this subsection; or24        (B) an amount calculated by the Teachers' Retirement 25    System of the State of Illinois using the average of the 26    monthly (or annual) salary obtained by dividing the total   SB3412- 19 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1    salary or earnings calculated under Article 16 applicable 2    to the member or participant during the 96 months (or 8 3    years) of service within the last 120 months (or 10 years) 4    of service in which the total salary or earnings 5    calculated under the Article was the highest by the number 6    of months (or years) of service in that period.7    (b-5) Beginning on January 1, 2011, for all purposes under 8this Code (including without limitation the calculation of 9benefits and employee contributions), the annual earnings, 10salary, or wages (based on the plan year) of a member or 11participant to whom this Section applies shall not exceed 12$106,800; however, that amount shall annually thereafter be 13increased by the lesser of (i) 3% of that amount, including all 14previous adjustments, or (ii) one-half the annual unadjusted 15percentage increase (but not less than zero) in the consumer 16price index-u for the 12 months ending with the September 17preceding each November 1, including all previous adjustments.18    For the purposes of this Section, "consumer price index-u" 19means the index published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of 20the United States Department of Labor that measures the 21average change in prices of goods and services purchased by 22all urban consumers, United States city average, all items, 231982-84 = 100. The new amount resulting from each annual 24adjustment shall be determined by the Public Pension Division 25of the Department of Insurance and made available to the 26boards of the retirement systems and pension funds by November   SB3412- 20 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b11 of each year. 2    (b-10) Beginning on January 1, 2024, for all purposes 3under this Code (including, without limitation, the 4calculation of benefits and employee contributions), the 5annual earnings, salary, or wages (based on the plan year) of a 6member or participant under Article 9 to whom this Section 7applies shall include an annual earnings, salary, or wage cap 8that tracks the Social Security wage base. Maximum annual 9earnings, wages, or salary shall be the annual contribution 10and benefit base established for the applicable year by the 11Commissioner of the Social Security Administration under the 12federal Social Security Act. 13    However, in no event shall the annual earnings, salary, or 14wages for the purposes of this Article and Article 9 exceed any 15limitation imposed on annual earnings, salary, or wages under 16Section 1-117. Under no circumstances shall the maximum amount 17of annual earnings, salary, or wages be greater than the 18amount set forth in this subsection (b-10) as a result of 19reciprocal service or any provisions regarding reciprocal 20services, nor shall the Fund under Article 9 be required to pay 21any refund as a result of the application of this maximum 22annual earnings, salary, and wage cap. 23    Nothing in this subsection (b-10) shall cause or otherwise 24result in any retroactive adjustment of any employee 25contributions. Nothing in this subsection (b-10) shall cause 26or otherwise result in any retroactive adjustment of   SB3412- 21 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1disability or other payments made between January 1, 2011 and 2January 1, 2024. 3    (c) A member or participant is entitled to a retirement 4annuity upon written application if he or she has attained age 567 (age 65, with respect to service under Article 12 that is 6subject to this Section, for a member or participant under 7Article 12 who first becomes a member or participant under 8Article 12 on or after January 1, 2022 or who makes the 9election under item (i) of subsection (d-15) of this Section) 10and has at least 10 years of service credit and is otherwise 11eligible under the requirements of the applicable Article. 12    A member or participant who has attained age 62 (age 60, 13with respect to service under Article 12 that is subject to 14this Section, for a member or participant under Article 12 who 15first becomes a member or participant under Article 12 on or 16after January 1, 2022 or who makes the election under item (i) 17of subsection (d-15) of this Section) and has at least 10 years 18of service credit and is otherwise eligible under the 19requirements of the applicable Article may elect to receive 20the lower retirement annuity provided in subsection (d) of 21this Section. 22    (c-5) A person who first becomes a member or a participant 23subject to this Section on or after July 6, 2017 (the effective 24date of Public Act 100-23), notwithstanding any other 25provision of this Code to the contrary, is entitled to a 26retirement annuity under Article 8 or Article 11 upon written   SB3412- 22 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1application if he or she has attained age 65 and has at least 210 years of service credit and is otherwise eligible under the 3requirements of Article 8 or Article 11 of this Code, 4whichever is applicable. 5    (c-10) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code to 6the contrary, a participant who is subject to this Section and 7is (i) a deputy sheriff under Article 9, (ii) a member of the 8Cook County Police Department under Article 9, (iii) a 9correctional officer under Article 9, or (iv) a police officer 10with the Cook County Forest Preserve District under Article 10 11is entitled to a retirement annuity upon written application 12if he or she has attained age 55, has at least 20 years of 13service credit for service in any combination of those 14positions, and is otherwise eligible under the applicable 15Article of this Code. 16    (d) The retirement annuity of a member or participant who 17is retiring after attaining age 62 (age 60, with respect to 18service under Article 12 that is subject to this Section, for a 19member or participant under Article 12 who first becomes a 20member or participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 212022 or who makes the election under item (i) of subsection 22(d-15) of this Section) with at least 10 years of service 23credit shall be reduced by one-half of 1% for each full month 24that the member's age is under age 67 (age 65, with respect to 25service under Article 12 that is subject to this Section, for a 26member or participant under Article 12 who first becomes a   SB3412- 23 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1member or participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 22022 or who makes the election under item (i) of subsection 3(d-15) of this Section).4    (d-5) The retirement annuity payable under Article 8 or 5Article 11 to an eligible person subject to subsection (c-5) 6of this Section who is retiring at age 60 with at least 10 7years of service credit shall be reduced by one-half of 1% for 8each full month that the member's age is under age 65. 9    (d-10) Each person who first became a member or 10participant under Article 8 or Article 11 of this Code on or 11after January 1, 2011 and prior to July 6, 2017 (the effective 12date of Public Act 100-23) shall make an irrevocable election 13either:14        (i) to be eligible for the reduced retirement age 15    provided in subsections (c-5) and (d-5) of this Section, 16    the eligibility for which is conditioned upon the member 17    or participant agreeing to the increases in employee 18    contributions for age and service annuities provided in 19    subsection (a-5) of Section 8-174 of this Code (for 20    service under Article 8) or subsection (a-5) of Section 21    11-170 of this Code (for service under Article 11); or 22        (ii) to not agree to item (i) of this subsection 23    (d-10), in which case the member or participant shall 24    continue to be subject to the retirement age provisions in 25    subsections (c) and (d) of this Section and the employee 26    contributions for age and service annuity as provided in   SB3412- 24 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1    subsection (a) of Section 8-174 of this Code (for service 2    under Article 8) or subsection (a) of Section 11-170 of 3    this Code (for service under Article 11). 4    The election provided for in this subsection shall be made 5between October 1, 2017 and November 15, 2017. A person 6subject to this subsection who makes the required election 7shall remain bound by that election. A person subject to this 8subsection who fails for any reason to make the required 9election within the time specified in this subsection shall be 10deemed to have made the election under item (ii). 11    (d-15) Each person who first becomes a member or 12participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 2011 and 13prior to January 1, 2022 shall make an irrevocable election 14either: 15        (i) to be eligible for the reduced retirement age 16    specified in subsections (c) and (d) of this Section, the 17    eligibility for which is conditioned upon the member or 18    participant agreeing to the increase in employee 19    contributions for service annuities specified in 20    subsection (b) of Section 12-150; or21        (ii) to not agree to item (i) of this subsection 22    (d-15), in which case the member or participant shall not 23    be eligible for the reduced retirement age specified in 24    subsections (c) and (d) of this Section and shall not be 25    subject to the increase in employee contributions for 26    service annuities specified in subsection (b) of Section   SB3412- 25 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1    12-150. 2    The election provided for in this subsection shall be made 3between January 1, 2022 and April 1, 2022. A person subject to 4this subsection who makes the required election shall remain 5bound by that election. A person subject to this subsection 6who fails for any reason to make the required election within 7the time specified in this subsection shall be deemed to have 8made the election under item (ii). 9    (e) Any retirement annuity or supplemental annuity shall 10be subject to annual increases on the January 1 occurring 11either on or after the attainment of age 67 (age 65, with 12respect to service under Article 12 that is subject to this 13Section, for a member or participant under Article 12 who 14first becomes a member or participant under Article 12 on or 15after January 1, 2022 or who makes the election under item (i) 16of subsection (d-15); and beginning on July 6, 2017 (the 17effective date of Public Act 100-23), age 65 with respect to 18service under Article 8 or Article 11 for eligible persons 19who: (i) are subject to subsection (c-5) of this Section; or 20(ii) made the election under item (i) of subsection (d-10) of 21this Section) or the first anniversary of the annuity start 22date, whichever is later. Each annual increase shall be 23calculated at 3% or one-half the annual unadjusted percentage 24increase (but not less than zero) in the consumer price 25index-u for the 12 months ending with the September preceding 26each November 1, whichever is less, of the originally granted   SB3412- 26 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1retirement annuity. If the annual unadjusted percentage change 2in the consumer price index-u for the 12 months ending with the 3September preceding each November 1 is zero or there is a 4decrease, then the annuity shall not be increased. 5    For the purposes of Section 1-103.1 of this Code, the 6changes made to this Section by Public Act 102-263 are 7applicable without regard to whether the employee was in 8active service on or after August 6, 2021 (the effective date 9of Public Act 102-263). 10    For the purposes of Section 1-103.1 of this Code, the 11changes made to this Section by Public Act 100-23 are 12applicable without regard to whether the employee was in 13active service on or after July 6, 2017 (the effective date of 14Public Act 100-23). 15    (f) The initial survivor's or widow's annuity of an 16otherwise eligible survivor or widow of a retired member or 17participant who first became a member or participant on or 18after January 1, 2011 shall be in the amount of 66 2/3% of the 19retired member's or participant's retirement annuity at the 20date of death. In the case of the death of a member or 21participant who has not retired and who first became a member 22or participant on or after January 1, 2011, eligibility for a 23survivor's or widow's annuity shall be determined by the 24applicable Article of this Code. The initial benefit shall be 2566 2/3% of the earned annuity without a reduction due to age. A 26child's annuity of an otherwise eligible child shall be in the   SB3412- 27 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1amount prescribed under each Article if applicable. Any 2survivor's or widow's annuity shall be increased (1) on each 3January 1 occurring on or after the commencement of the 4annuity if the deceased member died while receiving a 5retirement annuity or (2) in other cases, on each January 1 6occurring after the first anniversary of the commencement of 7the annuity. Each annual increase shall be calculated at 3% or 8one-half the annual unadjusted percentage increase (but not 9less than zero) in the consumer price index-u for the 12 months 10ending with the September preceding each November 1, whichever 11is less, of the originally granted survivor's annuity. If the 12annual unadjusted percentage change in the consumer price 13index-u for the 12 months ending with the September preceding 14each November 1 is zero or there is a decrease, then the 15annuity shall not be increased. 16    (g) The benefits in Section 14-110 apply only if the 17person is a State policeman, a fire fighter in the fire 18protection service of a department, a conservation police 19officer, an investigator for the Secretary of State, an arson 20investigator, a Commerce Commission police officer, 21investigator for the Department of Revenue or the Illinois 22Gaming Board, a security employee of the Department of 23Corrections or the Department of Juvenile Justice, or a 24security employee of the Department of Innovation and 25Technology, as those terms are defined in subsection (b) and 26subsection (c) of Section 14-110. A person who meets the   SB3412- 28 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1requirements of this Section is entitled to an annuity 2calculated under the provisions of Section 14-110, in lieu of 3the regular or minimum retirement annuity, only if the person 4has withdrawn from service with not less than 20 years of 5eligible creditable service and has attained age 60, 6regardless of whether the attainment of age 60 occurs while 7the person is still in service. 8    (h) If a person who first becomes a member or a participant 9of a retirement system or pension fund subject to this Section 10on or after January 1, 2011 is receiving a retirement annuity 11or retirement pension under that system or fund and becomes a 12member or participant under any other system or fund created 13by this Code and is employed on a full-time basis, except for 14those members or participants exempted from the provisions of 15this Section under subsection (a) of this Section, then the 16person's retirement annuity or retirement pension under that 17system or fund shall be suspended during that employment. Upon 18termination of that employment, the person's retirement 19annuity or retirement pension payments shall resume and be 20recalculated if recalculation is provided for under the 21applicable Article of this Code.22    If a person who first becomes a member of a retirement 23system or pension fund subject to this Section on or after 24January 1, 2012 and is receiving a retirement annuity or 25retirement pension under that system or fund and accepts on a 26contractual basis a position to provide services to a   SB3412- 29 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1governmental entity from which he or she has retired, then 2that person's annuity or retirement pension earned as an 3active employee of the employer shall be suspended during that 4contractual service. A person receiving an annuity or 5retirement pension under this Code shall notify the pension 6fund or retirement system from which he or she is receiving an 7annuity or retirement pension, as well as his or her 8contractual employer, of his or her retirement status before 9accepting contractual employment. A person who fails to submit 10such notification shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and 11required to pay a fine of $1,000. Upon termination of that 12contractual employment, the person's retirement annuity or 13retirement pension payments shall resume and, if appropriate, 14be recalculated under the applicable provisions of this Code. 15    (i) (Blank). 16    (j) In the case of a conflict between the provisions of 17this Section and any other provision of this Code, the 18provisions of this Section shall control.19(Source: P.A. 101-610, eff. 1-1-20; 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 20102-210, eff. 1-1-22; 102-263, eff. 8-6-21; 102-813, eff. 215-13-22; 103-529, eff. 8-11-23.) 22    (Text of Section from P.A. 102-956)23    Sec. 1-160. Provisions applicable to new hires. 24    (a) The provisions of this Section apply to a person who, 25on or after January 1, 2011, first becomes a member or a   SB3412- 30 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1participant under any reciprocal retirement system or pension 2fund established under this Code, other than a retirement 3system or pension fund established under Article 2, 3, 4, 5, 6, 47, 15, or 18 of this Code, notwithstanding any other provision 5of this Code to the contrary, but do not apply to any 6self-managed plan established under this Code or to any 7participant of the retirement plan established under Section 822-101; except that this Section applies to a person who 9elected to establish alternative credits by electing in 10writing after January 1, 2011, but before August 8, 2011, 11under Section 7-145.1 of this Code. Notwithstanding anything 12to the contrary in this Section, for purposes of this Section, 13a person who is a Tier 1 regular employee as defined in Section 147-109.4 of this Code or who participated in a retirement 15system under Article 15 prior to January 1, 2011 shall be 16deemed a person who first became a member or participant prior 17to January 1, 2011 under any retirement system or pension fund 18subject to this Section. The changes made to this Section by 19Public Act 98-596 are a clarification of existing law and are 20intended to be retroactive to January 1, 2011 (the effective 21date of Public Act 96-889), notwithstanding the provisions of 22Section 1-103.1 of this Code.23    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 24noncovered employee under Article 14 on or after the 25implementation date of the plan created under Section 1-161 26for that Article, unless that person elects under subsection   SB3412- 31 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1(b) of Section 1-161 to instead receive the benefits provided 2under this Section and the applicable provisions of that 3Article.4    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 5member or participant under Article 16 on or after the 6implementation date of the plan created under Section 1-161 7for that Article, unless that person elects under subsection 8(b) of Section 1-161 to instead receive the benefits provided 9under this Section and the applicable provisions of that 10Article.11    This Section does not apply to a person who elects under 12subsection (c-5) of Section 1-161 to receive the benefits 13under Section 1-161. 14    This Section does not apply to a person who first becomes a 15member or participant of an affected pension fund on or after 6 16months after the resolution or ordinance date, as defined in 17Section 1-162, unless that person elects under subsection (c) 18of Section 1-162 to receive the benefits provided under this 19Section and the applicable provisions of the Article under 20which he or she is a member or participant. 21    (b) "Final average salary" means, except as otherwise 22provided in this subsection, the average monthly (or annual) 23salary obtained by dividing the total salary or earnings 24calculated under the Article applicable to the member or 25participant during the 96 consecutive months (or 8 consecutive 26years) of service within the last 120 months (or 10 years) of   SB3412- 32 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1service in which the total salary or earnings calculated under 2the applicable Article was the highest by the number of months 3(or years) of service in that period. For the purposes of a 4person who first becomes a member or participant of any 5retirement system or pension fund to which this Section 6applies on or after January 1, 2011, in this Code, "final 7average salary" shall be substituted for the following:8        (1) (Blank).9        (2) In Articles 8, 9, 10, 11, and 12, "highest average 10    annual salary for any 4 consecutive years within the last 11    10 years of service immediately preceding the date of 12    withdrawal". 13        (3) In Article 13, "average final salary". 14        (4) In Article 14, "final average compensation". 15        (5) In Article 17, "average salary". 16        (6) In Section 22-207, "wages or salary received by 17    him at the date of retirement or discharge". 18    A member of the Teachers' Retirement System of the State 19of Illinois who retires on or after June 1, 2021 and for whom 20the 2020-2021 school year is used in the calculation of the 21member's final average salary shall use the higher of the 22following for the purpose of determining the member's final 23average salary:24        (A) the amount otherwise calculated under the first 25    paragraph of this subsection; or26        (B) an amount calculated by the Teachers' Retirement   SB3412- 33 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1    System of the State of Illinois using the average of the 2    monthly (or annual) salary obtained by dividing the total 3    salary or earnings calculated under Article 16 applicable 4    to the member or participant during the 96 months (or 8 5    years) of service within the last 120 months (or 10 years) 6    of service in which the total salary or earnings 7    calculated under the Article was the highest by the number 8    of months (or years) of service in that period.9    (b-5) Beginning on January 1, 2011, for all purposes under 10this Code (including without limitation the calculation of 11benefits and employee contributions), the annual earnings, 12salary, or wages (based on the plan year) of a member or 13participant to whom this Section applies shall not exceed 14$106,800; however, that amount shall annually thereafter be 15increased by the lesser of (i) 3% of that amount, including all 16previous adjustments, or (ii) one-half the annual unadjusted 17percentage increase (but not less than zero) in the consumer 18price index-u for the 12 months ending with the September 19preceding each November 1, including all previous adjustments.20    For the purposes of this Section, "consumer price index-u" 21means the index published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of 22the United States Department of Labor that measures the 23average change in prices of goods and services purchased by 24all urban consumers, United States city average, all items, 251982-84 = 100. The new amount resulting from each annual 26adjustment shall be determined by the Public Pension Division   SB3412- 34 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1of the Department of Insurance and made available to the 2boards of the retirement systems and pension funds by November 31 of each year. 4    (b-10) Beginning on January 1, 2024, for all purposes 5under this Code (including, without limitation, the 6calculation of benefits and employee contributions), the 7annual earnings, salary, or wages (based on the plan year) of a 8member or participant under Article 9 to whom this Section 9applies shall include an annual earnings, salary, or wage cap 10that tracks the Social Security wage base. Maximum annual 11earnings, wages, or salary shall be the annual contribution 12and benefit base established for the applicable year by the 13Commissioner of the Social Security Administration under the 14federal Social Security Act. 15    However, in no event shall the annual earnings, salary, or 16wages for the purposes of this Article and Article 9 exceed any 17limitation imposed on annual earnings, salary, or wages under 18Section 1-117. Under no circumstances shall the maximum amount 19of annual earnings, salary, or wages be greater than the 20amount set forth in this subsection (b-10) as a result of 21reciprocal service or any provisions regarding reciprocal 22services, nor shall the Fund under Article 9 be required to pay 23any refund as a result of the application of this maximum 24annual earnings, salary, and wage cap. 25    Nothing in this subsection (b-10) shall cause or otherwise 26result in any retroactive adjustment of any employee   SB3412- 35 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1contributions. Nothing in this subsection (b-10) shall cause 2or otherwise result in any retroactive adjustment of 3disability or other payments made between January 1, 2011 and 4January 1, 2024. 5    (c) A member or participant is entitled to a retirement 6annuity upon written application if he or she has attained age 767 (age 65, with respect to service under Article 12 that is 8subject to this Section, for a member or participant under 9Article 12 who first becomes a member or participant under 10Article 12 on or after January 1, 2022 or who makes the 11election under item (i) of subsection (d-15) of this Section) 12and has at least 10 years of service credit and is otherwise 13eligible under the requirements of the applicable Article. 14    A member or participant who has attained age 62 (age 60, 15with respect to service under Article 12 that is subject to 16this Section, for a member or participant under Article 12 who 17first becomes a member or participant under Article 12 on or 18after January 1, 2022 or who makes the election under item (i) 19of subsection (d-15) of this Section) and has at least 10 years 20of service credit and is otherwise eligible under the 21requirements of the applicable Article may elect to receive 22the lower retirement annuity provided in subsection (d) of 23this Section. 24    (c-5) A person who first becomes a member or a participant 25subject to this Section on or after July 6, 2017 (the effective 26date of Public Act 100-23), notwithstanding any other   SB3412- 36 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1provision of this Code to the contrary, is entitled to a 2retirement annuity under Article 8 or Article 11 upon written 3application if he or she has attained age 65 and has at least 410 years of service credit and is otherwise eligible under the 5requirements of Article 8 or Article 11 of this Code, 6whichever is applicable. 7    (c-10) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code to 8the contrary, a participant who is subject to this Section and 9is (i) a deputy sheriff under Article 9, (ii) a member of the 10Cook County Police Department under Article 9, (iii) a 11correctional officer under Article 9, or (iv) a police officer 12with the Cook County Forest Preserve District under Article 10 13is entitled to a retirement annuity upon written application 14if he or she has attained age 55, has at least 20 years of 15service credit for service in any combination of those 16positions, and is otherwise eligible under the applicable 17Article of this Code. 18    (d) The retirement annuity of a member or participant who 19is retiring after attaining age 62 (age 60, with respect to 20service under Article 12 that is subject to this Section, for a 21member or participant under Article 12 who first becomes a 22member or participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 232022 or who makes the election under item (i) of subsection 24(d-15) of this Section) with at least 10 years of service 25credit shall be reduced by one-half of 1% for each full month 26that the member's age is under age 67 (age 65, with respect to   SB3412- 37 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1service under Article 12 that is subject to this Section, for a 2member or participant under Article 12 who first becomes a 3member or participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 42022 or who makes the election under item (i) of subsection 5(d-15) of this Section).6    (d-5) The retirement annuity payable under Article 8 or 7Article 11 to an eligible person subject to subsection (c-5) 8of this Section who is retiring at age 60 with at least 10 9years of service credit shall be reduced by one-half of 1% for 10each full month that the member's age is under age 65. 11    (d-10) Each person who first became a member or 12participant under Article 8 or Article 11 of this Code on or 13after January 1, 2011 and prior to July 6, 2017 (the effective 14date of Public Act 100-23) shall make an irrevocable election 15either:16        (i) to be eligible for the reduced retirement age 17    provided in subsections (c-5) and (d-5) of this Section, 18    the eligibility for which is conditioned upon the member 19    or participant agreeing to the increases in employee 20    contributions for age and service annuities provided in 21    subsection (a-5) of Section 8-174 of this Code (for 22    service under Article 8) or subsection (a-5) of Section 23    11-170 of this Code (for service under Article 11); or 24        (ii) to not agree to item (i) of this subsection 25    (d-10), in which case the member or participant shall 26    continue to be subject to the retirement age provisions in   SB3412- 38 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1    subsections (c) and (d) of this Section and the employee 2    contributions for age and service annuity as provided in 3    subsection (a) of Section 8-174 of this Code (for service 4    under Article 8) or subsection (a) of Section 11-170 of 5    this Code (for service under Article 11). 6    The election provided for in this subsection shall be made 7between October 1, 2017 and November 15, 2017. A person 8subject to this subsection who makes the required election 9shall remain bound by that election. A person subject to this 10subsection who fails for any reason to make the required 11election within the time specified in this subsection shall be 12deemed to have made the election under item (ii). 13    (d-15) Each person who first becomes a member or 14participant under Article 12 on or after January 1, 2011 and 15prior to January 1, 2022 shall make an irrevocable election 16either: 17        (i) to be eligible for the reduced retirement age 18    specified in subsections (c) and (d) of this Section, the 19    eligibility for which is conditioned upon the member or 20    participant agreeing to the increase in employee 21    contributions for service annuities specified in 22    subsection (b) of Section 12-150; or23        (ii) to not agree to item (i) of this subsection 24    (d-15), in which case the member or participant shall not 25    be eligible for the reduced retirement age specified in 26    subsections (c) and (d) of this Section and shall not be   SB3412- 39 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1    subject to the increase in employee contributions for 2    service annuities specified in subsection (b) of Section 3    12-150. 4    The election provided for in this subsection shall be made 5between January 1, 2022 and April 1, 2022. A person subject to 6this subsection who makes the required election shall remain 7bound by that election. A person subject to this subsection 8who fails for any reason to make the required election within 9the time specified in this subsection shall be deemed to have 10made the election under item (ii). 11    (e) Any retirement annuity or supplemental annuity shall 12be subject to annual increases on the January 1 occurring 13either on or after the attainment of age 67 (age 65, with 14respect to service under Article 12 that is subject to this 15Section, for a member or participant under Article 12 who 16first becomes a member or participant under Article 12 on or 17after January 1, 2022 or who makes the election under item (i) 18of subsection (d-15); and beginning on July 6, 2017 (the 19effective date of Public Act 100-23), age 65 with respect to 20service under Article 8 or Article 11 for eligible persons 21who: (i) are subject to subsection (c-5) of this Section; or 22(ii) made the election under item (i) of subsection (d-10) of 23this Section) or the first anniversary of the annuity start 24date, whichever is later. Each annual increase shall be 25calculated at 3% or one-half the annual unadjusted percentage 26increase (but not less than zero) in the consumer price   SB3412- 40 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1index-u for the 12 months ending with the September preceding 2each November 1, whichever is less, of the originally granted 3retirement annuity. If the annual unadjusted percentage change 4in the consumer price index-u for the 12 months ending with the 5September preceding each November 1 is zero or there is a 6decrease, then the annuity shall not be increased. 7    For the purposes of Section 1-103.1 of this Code, the 8changes made to this Section by Public Act 102-263 are 9applicable without regard to whether the employee was in 10active service on or after August 6, 2021 (the effective date 11of Public Act 102-263). 12    For the purposes of Section 1-103.1 of this Code, the 13changes made to this Section by Public Act 100-23 are 14applicable without regard to whether the employee was in 15active service on or after July 6, 2017 (the effective date of 16Public Act 100-23). 17    (f) The initial survivor's or widow's annuity of an 18otherwise eligible survivor or widow of a retired member or 19participant who first became a member or participant on or 20after January 1, 2011 shall be in the amount of 66 2/3% of the 21retired member's or participant's retirement annuity at the 22date of death. In the case of the death of a member or 23participant who has not retired and who first became a member 24or participant on or after January 1, 2011, eligibility for a 25survivor's or widow's annuity shall be determined by the 26applicable Article of this Code. The initial benefit shall be   SB3412- 41 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b166 2/3% of the earned annuity without a reduction due to age. A 2child's annuity of an otherwise eligible child shall be in the 3amount prescribed under each Article if applicable. Any 4survivor's or widow's annuity shall be increased (1) on each 5January 1 occurring on or after the commencement of the 6annuity if the deceased member died while receiving a 7retirement annuity or (2) in other cases, on each January 1 8occurring after the first anniversary of the commencement of 9the annuity. Each annual increase shall be calculated at 3% or 10one-half the annual unadjusted percentage increase (but not 11less than zero) in the consumer price index-u for the 12 months 12ending with the September preceding each November 1, whichever 13is less, of the originally granted survivor's annuity. If the 14annual unadjusted percentage change in the consumer price 15index-u for the 12 months ending with the September preceding 16each November 1 is zero or there is a decrease, then the 17annuity shall not be increased. 18    (g) The benefits in Section 14-110 apply only if the 19person is a State policeman, a fire fighter in the fire 20protection service of a department, a conservation police 21officer, an investigator for the Secretary of State, an 22investigator for the Office of the Attorney General, an arson 23investigator, a Commerce Commission police officer, 24investigator for the Department of Revenue or the Illinois 25Gaming Board, a security employee of the Department of 26Corrections or the Department of Juvenile Justice, or a   SB3412- 42 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1security employee of the Department of Innovation and 2Technology, as those terms are defined in subsection (b) and 3subsection (c) of Section 14-110. A person who meets the 4requirements of this Section is entitled to an annuity 5calculated under the provisions of Section 14-110, in lieu of 6the regular or minimum retirement annuity, only if the person 7has withdrawn from service with not less than 20 years of 8eligible creditable service and has attained age 60, 9regardless of whether the attainment of age 60 occurs while 10the person is still in service. 11    (h) If a person who first becomes a member or a participant 12of a retirement system or pension fund subject to this Section 13on or after January 1, 2011 is receiving a retirement annuity 14or retirement pension under that system or fund and becomes a 15member or participant under any other system or fund created 16by this Code and is employed on a full-time basis, except for 17those members or participants exempted from the provisions of 18this Section under subsection (a) of this Section, then the 19person's retirement annuity or retirement pension under that 20system or fund shall be suspended during that employment. Upon 21termination of that employment, the person's retirement 22annuity or retirement pension payments shall resume and be 23recalculated if recalculation is provided for under the 24applicable Article of this Code.25    If a person who first becomes a member of a retirement 26system or pension fund subject to this Section on or after   SB3412- 43 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1January 1, 2012 and is receiving a retirement annuity or 2retirement pension under that system or fund and accepts on a 3contractual basis a position to provide services to a 4governmental entity from which he or she has retired, then 5that person's annuity or retirement pension earned as an 6active employee of the employer shall be suspended during that 7contractual service. A person receiving an annuity or 8retirement pension under this Code shall notify the pension 9fund or retirement system from which he or she is receiving an 10annuity or retirement pension, as well as his or her 11contractual employer, of his or her retirement status before 12accepting contractual employment. A person who fails to submit 13such notification shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor and 14required to pay a fine of $1,000. Upon termination of that 15contractual employment, the person's retirement annuity or 16retirement pension payments shall resume and, if appropriate, 17be recalculated under the applicable provisions of this Code. 18    (i) (Blank). 19    (j) In the case of a conflict between the provisions of 20this Section and any other provision of this Code, the 21provisions of this Section shall control.22(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-210, eff. 1-1-22; 23102-263, eff. 8-6-21; 102-956, eff. 5-27-22; 103-529, eff. 248-11-23.) 25    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding   SB3412- 44 -LRB104 18615 RPS 32058 b1Section 8.50 as follows: 2    (30 ILCS 805/8.50 new)3    Sec. 8.50. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 48 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 5the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 6Act of the 104th General Assembly.